District of Columbia statutes.
22-1404

Falsely impersonating public officer or minister.

Whoever falsely represents himself or herself to be a judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, notary public, police officer, or other public officer, or a minister qualified to celebrate marriage, and attempts to perform the duty or exercise the authority pertaining to any such office or character, or having been duly appointed to any of such offices shall knowingly attempt to act as any such officers after his or her appointment or commission has expired or he or she has been dismissed from such office, shall suffer imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than 1 year nor more than 3 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1330, ch. 854, § 860
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1639
May 17, 1996, D.C. Law 11-119, § 2, 43 DCR 528
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(o), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-1304.
1973 Ed., § 22-1304.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(o) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.